District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.09

Reciprocity.

EMS personnel shall recognize a comfort care bracelet, necklace, or similar identifier issued by Maryland and Virginia as if issued in accordance with this chapter and shall act on the identifier in accordance with this chapter.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 10, 48 DCR 27

History